en: small white beans
sv: små vita bönor

en: large white beans
sv: stora vita bönor

en: lingot beans, white lingot beans
fr: lingots blancs, lingo blanc, haricots lingots blancs, haricots blancs lingots, lingot, lingots, lingots blancs, haricots lingots
hu: lingot bab, fehér bab
it: fagioli lingotti

en: Castelnaudary lingot beans
fr: Lingots de Castelnaudary
it: fagioli lingotti di Castelnaudary

en: black bean, black beans, black field beans
bg: черен боб
cs: černé fazole, fazole černé
da: sorte bønner
de: schwarze Bohnen, Bohnen schwarz
es: Alubias negras
fi: mustapapu, mustapavut
fr: haricot noir, haricots noirs
hr: crni grah
hu: feketebab
it: Fagioli neri
nl: Zwarte bonen
pl: fasola czarna, fasoli czarnej
pt: Feijão preto
sv: svarta bönor

en: black turtle bean
it: fagiolo tartaruga nero
ja: 黒いんげん豆

en: black bean flour
fr: farine de haricots noirs
it: farina di fagioli neri

en: Boston bean
it: fagioli Boston

en: kidney bean
hu: Vörösbab
it: fagiolo rosso
pl: fasola czerwona kidney

en: red bean, red beans, red kidney beans, red rajmah, red rajma
bg: червен боб
da: Røde kidneybønner, kidneybønner
de: Rote Bohnen, Kidneybohnen, Kidney-Bohnen
es: Alubias rojas, judias rojas
fi: punaiset kidneypavut, kidneypapu
fr: haricot rouge, haricots rouges
hr: crveni grah
hu: vesebab
it: fagioli rossi
ja: 金時豆, 赤インゲン豆
lv: sarkanās pupiņas
nl: Rode bonen
pl: fasola czerwona, fasoli czerwonej, czerwona fasola
pt: Feijões vermelhos
ru: фасоль красная, красная фасоль, Фасоль крупа красная
sv: röda kidneybönor, kidneybönor

en: small red beans
de: Kleine rote Bohnen
fr: Petit haricots rouges
hr: mali crveni grah
it: fagiolini rossi piccoli

en: dried kidney beans
de: Getrocknete Kidneybohnen, Kidneybohnen getrocknet
fr: haricots rouges secs
hr: sušeni grah
it: fagioli rossi secchi

en: cannellini beans, white kidney beans
de: Cannellini Bohnen, Cannellinibohnen
fr: haricots cannellini
hr: cannellini grah
it: fagioli cannellini, cannellini
sv: cannellinibönor, cannelliniböna

en: horse gram, kulthi
la: Macrotyloma uniflorum

en: mung bean, mungbean, green gram
ar: بقلة الماش
bg: птичи боб, бебриджа
bn: মুগ
bo: སྲན་ལྗང་།
ca: mongeta mung
cs: mung fazole
cy: ffeuen fwng
da: mung-bønne
de: Mungbohne, Mungbohnen
dv: ނޫމުގު
el: ροβίτσα
eo: mungfabo
es: judías mungo, habas de mungo
et: munguba
fa: ماش
fi: mungpapu
fr: haricot mungo, haricots mungo
gu: મગ
he: מש
hi: मूँग
hr: mungo grah, zlatni grah
hu: mungóbab
id: kacang hijau
it: fagioli mung, fagiolo mung
ja: リョクトウ, 緑豆, りょくとう
jv: kacang ijo
kn: ಹೆಸರು ಕಾಳು
ko: 녹두
ky: маш
la: vigna radiata, Phaseolus aureus
ml: ചെറുപയർ
mn: ногоон шош
mr: मूग
ms: pokok kacang hijau
my: ပဲတီစိမ်း
nb: mungbønne
ne: मुगी
nl: mungboon
or: ମୁଗ
pa: ਮੂੰਗੀ
pl: fasola złota, fasola mung, fasoli mung
ps: مۍ
ru: маш
sa: मुद्ग
si: මුංඇට
su: kacang héjo
sv: mungböna
sw: mchoroko
ta: பயறு
te: పెసలు
tg: мош
th: ถั่วเขียว
tl: monggo
uk: боби мунг
uz: mosh
vi: đậu xanh
za: duhheu
zh: 綠豆

en: mung bean powder
zh: 緣豆粉

en: mung bean sprout, mung bean seedlings
ca: brot de soja verda
cs: mungo klíčky
da: mungbonnespirer
de: Mungobohnenkeime, Mungbohnensprossen, Mungobohnensprosse, Mungobohnenkeimlinge
eo: mungidoj
es: brote de soja verde, brotes de judia mungo, brotes de soja verde
fr: pousse de soja vert, pousses de haricot mungo, germe de haricot mungo, pousses de haricots mungo, germes de haricot mungo, pousse de haricot mungo
hr: izdanak mungo graha
id: taoge
it: germogli di fagioli mung
ja: 緑豆スプラウト, 緑豆もやし, りょくとうもやし, もやし, 萌やし
jv: kecambah
km: សណ្ដែកបណ្
ko: 숙주나물
ms: tauge halus, kecambah
nl: taugé, mungboonscheut
nn: mungbonnespirer
pl: kiełki fasoli mung
sv: mungbönskott
th: ถั่วงอก
tl: toge
ug: پۇرچاق ئۈندۈرمىسى
uk: паростки вігни
vi: giá đỗ xanh
zh: 綠豆芽

en: black gram, urd bean, urd, Urad bean, Mungo bean, Black matpe bean, Urad Dal
fr: haricot urd, haricots urd, urd, haricot mungio à grain noir
hr: crni gram
it: grammo nero
la: vigna mungo, Phaseolus mungo

en: borlotti bean, borlotti, cranberry bean
de: Borlotti Bohnen, Borlottibohnen
fr: haricots borlotti, haricots marbrés
hr: šareni grah
it: fagioli borlotti
nl: borlotti bonen

en: black-eyed pea, blackeye peas, black eye beans, black eyed beans
de: Augenbohnen
dv: ލޫބިޔާ
fi: lehmäpapu, pitkäpapu
fr: dolique à oeil noir, cornille
hr: crnooki grašak
hu: homoki bab
id: Kacang tunggak
ja: 黒目豆
kn: ಅಲಸಂದೆ
la: Vigna unguiculata subsp. unguiculata
ln: Mbuengi
mk: Папуда
mr: चवळी
nl: zwarte oogbonen
pt: feijão-frade, feijão frade
si: කවුපී
vi: Đậu dải trắng rốn nâu
zh: 黑眼豆